Hawaii statutes.
§269-27 Prevention of unreasonable water
rates. In the event the public utilities commission, investigating as
provided in section 269-26, reports that in its judgment the rates charged to
consumers for water supplied to them for domestic uses and purposes, are not
reasonable, the attorney general shall take appropriate action to secure for
the consumers reasonable rates for such water, or, if the attorney general is
so advised, proceed to cancel the licenses and leases of the persons charging
the unreasonable rates. [L 1917, c 238, §2; RL 1925, §2204; RL 1935, §7962; RL
1945, §4723; RL 1955, §104-24; HRS §269-27; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next